Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2248
Attorney General; powers and duties.

At the request of the board, the Attorney General shall render to the board an opinion with respect to all questions of law arising in connection with the administration of the Real Property Appraiser Act and shall act as attorney for the board in all actions and proceedings brought by or against the board under or pursuant to the act. All fees and expenses of the Attorney General arising out of such duties shall be paid out of the Real Property Appraiser Fund. The Attorney General may appoint special counsel to prosecute such action, and all fees and expenses of such counsel allowed shall be taxed as costs in the action as the court may direct.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 48;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 52;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 40;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 68.